Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Article 5 Presidential Preference Primary

21-2-190.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Presidential Preference Primary Law.”

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1001A, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 221, § 1.

21-2-191.
Parties entitled to hold primaries; dates; decision to elect delegates to presidential nominating convention in primary; qualifying periods for candidates for delegate.

As provided in this article, a presidential preference primary shall be held in 2012 and every four years thereafter for each political party or body which has cast for its candidates for President and Vice President in the last presidential election more than 20 percent of the total vote cast for President and Vice President in this state, so that the electors may express their preference for one person to be the candidate for nomination by such person’s party or body for the office of President of the United States; provided, however, that no elector shall vote in the primary of more than one political party or body in the same presidential preference primary. Such primary shall be held in each year in which a presidential election is to be conducted on a date selected by the Secretary of State which shall not be later than the second Tuesday in June in such year. The Secretary of State shall select such date no later than December 1 of the year immediately preceding such primary. A state political party or body may by rule choose to elect any portion of its delegates to that party’s or body’s presidential nominating convention in the primary; and, if a state political party or body chooses to elect any portion of its delegates, such state political party or body shall establish the qualifying period for those candidates for delegate and delegate alternate positions which are to be elected in the primary and for any party officials to be elected in the primary and shall also establish the date on which state and county party executive committees shall certify to the Secretary of State or the superintendent, as the case may be, the names of any such candidates who are to be elected in the primary; provided, however, that such dates shall not be later than 60 days preceding the date on which the presidential preference primary is to be held.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1002A, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 221, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 429, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1223, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 220, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1, §§ 1, 1A; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 6; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 18; Ga. L. 2007, p. 544, § 2/SB 194; Ga. L. 2011, p. 630, § 1/HB 454.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was amended by §§ 1 and 1A of Ga. L. 1992, p. 1.
Section 6 of that Act, however, provided that § 1 of that Act would become effective upon the preclearance of this Act by the United States Attorney General pursuant to § 5 of the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended.
If the Act did not receive such preclearance on or before January 27, 1992, § 1 of the Act would be void and would stand repealed in its entirety as of that time and date and § 1A, which amended this Code section to read as it did prior to the amendment by § 1 of the Act, would become effective on January 28, 1992.
If § 1 did receive such preclearance, then § 1A of the Act would not become effective but would be void and stand repealed in its entirety upon § 1 becoming effective.
The Act received preclearance by the United States Attorney General on January 27, 1992.

21-2-192.
Proclamation by Governor; copies of proclamation transmitted to superintendents.

It shall be the duty of the Governor to issue his proclamation for such presidential preference primary, a copy of which shall be transmitted promptly by the Secretary of State to the superintendent of each county.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1008A, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 221, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1223, § 3; Ga. L. 1986, p. 220, § 2.

21-2-193.
List of names of candidates to appear on ballot; publication of list.

On a date set by the Secretary of State, but not later than 60 days preceding the date on which a presidential preference primary is to be held, the state executive committee of each party which is to conduct a presidential preference primary shall submit to the Secretary of State a list of the names of the candidates of such party to appear on the presidential preference primary ballot. Such lists shall be published on the website of the Secretary of State during the fourth week immediately preceding the date on which the presidential preference primary is to be held.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1003A, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 221, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 5, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 10; Ga. L. 1993, p. 118, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 7; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 19; Ga. L. 2007, p. 544, § 3/SB 194; Ga. L. 2011, p. 630, § 2/HB 454.

21-2-194.
[Reserved] Procedure for withdrawal of candidates.

History.

Ga. L. 1973, p. 221, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 11; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 8; repealed by Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 20, effective April 14, 1997.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 20 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective April 14, 1997.

21-2-195.
Procedures by which delegates and alternates to national nominating conventions selected.

The state executive committee of each political party or body shall determine the method and procedures by which delegates and delegate alternates to the national nominating conventions are to be selected as well as adopt any other rule not inconsistent with this article. The state executive committee of the political party or body shall establish, at least 90 days prior to the presidential preference primary, procedures to be followed in the nomination of candidates for delegates and delegate alternates to the nominating convention of the political party or body. A copy of any rule or regulation adopted by the state executive committee shall be sent to the Secretary of State within seven days after its adoption, to become a public record.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1005A, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 221, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1223, § 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1316, § 1.

Law reviews.

For note, “Selecting and Certifying National Political Convention Delegates — A Party or a State Right?,” see 4 Ga. L. Rev. 875 (1970).

21-2-196.
Qualification oath of delegates and alternates to national convention.

Any person selected as a delegate or delegate alternate to such national convention shall file a qualification oath with the
Secretary of State pledging support at the convention to the candidate of their political party or body for the office of President of the United States for whom they are selected to support. The oath shall state that the delegate or delegate alternate affirms to support such candidate until the candidate is either nominated by such convention or receives less than 35 percent of the votes for nomination by such convention during any balloting, or until the candidate releases the delegates from such pledge. No delegate shall be required to vote for such candidate after two convention nominating ballots have been completed.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1006A, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 221, § 1.

21-2-197.
Effect of withdrawal of presidential candidate.

Any delegate to a national convention whose presidential candidate withdraws after being entitled to delegate votes pursuant to this article shall be an unpledged delegate to the national convention.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1007A, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 221, § 1.

21-2-198.
Assessment of qualifying fee for candidates listed on presidential preference primary ballot.

No qualifying fee may be assessed for presidential candidates or for candidates for delegate or delegate alternate whose names are listed on a presidential preference primary ballot.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1009A, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 221, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1223, § 4.

21-2-199.
Election of political party committee members or officers at primary.

The presidential preference primary may be considered as a general primary for any political party wishing to elect committee members or officers therein. Such party shall prescribe by state party charter, bylaws, or rules and regulations regarding qualifying of candidates and the fixing and publishing of qualifying fees, if any.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1012A, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 1223, § 7.

21-2-200.
Applicability of general primary provisions; form of ballot.

A presidential preference primary shall be conducted, insofar as practicable, pursuant to this chapter respecting general primaries, except as otherwise provided in this article.
In setting up the form of the ballot, the Secretary of State shall provide for designating the name of the candidate to whom a candidate for delegate or delegate alternate is pledged, if any.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1011A, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 1223, § 6; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 9.